Massachusetts, session 194th, S942.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the Massachusetts Bay 
Transportation Authority, in collaboration with Bridgewater State University, shall implement a 
reduced fare pilot program for student semester commuter rail passes along the South Coast Rail 
corridor.  The pilot program shall provide a reduced fare equal to 50 per cent of the standard fare 
for students enrolled at said university who reside within a municipality along the South Coast 
Rail corridor, including but not limited to, the cities of New Bedford, Fall River, Taunton, and 
the towns of Acushnet, Berkley, Bridgewater, Dartmouth, Fairhaven, Freetown, Lakeville, 
Mattapoisett, Middleborough, Rochester, and Somerset.  Bridgewater State University shall 
distribute said passes and prioritize allocation based upon student financial need.  The authority 
shall implement the reduced fare pilot program for the 2025-2026 academic year and submit a 
report to the house and senate committees on ways and means detailing the total number of 
reduced student passes distributed, number of passes distributed delineated by the city or town of 

of 2 13 residence, and the total cost incurred to implement the program.  Said report shall be submitted 
no later than September 1, 2026.